District of Columbia statutes.
49-807

National Guard tuition assistance benefits.

Any funds contributed by the District of Columbia to the District of Columbia National Guard Tuition Assistance Program may be utilized, at the discretion of the District of Columbia National Guard, for tuition assistance benefits for all members or for new recruits; provided, that the member or new recruit is a resident of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 781, ch. 328, § 77
as added May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-158, § 301, 57 DCR 3000

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of National Guard Tuition Assistance Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-285, January 25, 2010, 57 DCR 1173).

Emergency Legislation